Utah statutes.
70A-2a-107.   Waiver or renunciation of claim or right after default.

Any claim or right arising out of an alleged default or breach of warranty may be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by a written waiver or renunciation signed and delivered by the aggrieved party.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 1990 General Session

